District of Columbia statutes.
20-1103

Distribution in kind; assignment, transfer and release of property.

If distribution in kind is made, the personal representative shall, upon the request of the distributee, execute and deliver an instrument of distribution assigning, transferring, or releasing property to the distributee as evidence of the distributee’s title to the property. Distribution of real property may be effected by quit claim deed. The personal representative shall pay all costs of deed recordation as a cost of administration of the estate. In addition to any other indexing, a deed distributed under this section shall be recorded among the land records as required by law and shall be indexed in the grantor index under the decedent’s name.

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155

History

1981 Ed., § 20-1103.

Prior Codifications